Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act, “state  agency” means every state
officer, board, commission, department, institution, branch or agency of the state govern-
ment, the costs of which are paid wholly or in part from funds held in the State Treasury.
SECTION 2.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 291.232 to 291.260, and subject to any rule that  may
be adopted by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, any obligations  incurred
by a state agency  on or after July 1, 2025, that do not exceed one-eighth of the level of ex-
penditures authorized for the state agency for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, are au-
thorized, and necessary funds are appropriated  therefor, unless the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services determines that the state agency’s expenditure level should be  de-
creased, based on pending legislation.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services by  rule shall specify the means
whereby funds expended pursuant to subsection (1) of this section are reconciled and charged
to the state agency’s 2025-2027  legislatively adopted budget during the 2025-2027 biennium,
except as provided by section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(3) All payments for debt service, certificates of participation and other financing agree-
ments are hereby authorized during the period commencing July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. (1)(a) If there is no 2025-2027 legislatively adopted budget upon  final
adjournment of the regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative  Assembly against which
any expenditure authorized by section 2 (1) of this 2025 Act can be applied, the expenditure
shall be considered to have been made from funds appropriated to the Oregon  Department
of Administrative Services.
(b) For the purpose  of paying the incurred expenses of state agencies, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services any  cash or other funds remain-
ing in the accounts of the state agency for which no budget has been adopted and for  which
no expenditure authority exists when the Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
(c) The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services may apply for reimbursement
from the Emergency Board or the Legislative Assembly of any expenditure made  under this
subsection during the 2025-2027 biennium.
(2)(a) If, after final adjournment of the regular  session of the Eighty-third Legislative
Assembly, the Governor vetoes a legislatively adopted budget against which any expenditure
Enrolled Senate Bill 5546 (SB 5546-A) Page 1
authorized by section 2 (1) of this 2025 Act can be applied, the expenditure shall be considered
to have been made from funds appropriated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative
Services.
(b) For the purpose  of paying the incurred expenses of state agencies, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services any  cash or other funds remain-
ing in the accounts of the state agency for  which a legislatively adopted budget has been
vetoed and for which no expenditure authority exists when the Governor vetoes the budget.
(c) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services  may apply for reimbursement
from the Emergency  Board or the Legislative Assembly of any expenditure made under this
subsection during the 2025-2027 biennium.
SECTION 4. Sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act apply to a state agency for which no  budget
has become law on or before July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. Sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act are repealed on September 15, 2025.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5546 (SB 5546-A) Page 2